Washington statutes.
RCW 8.26.085

Lead agency's rule-making authority—Compliance date.

(1) The lead agency, after full consultation with the department of enterprise services, shall adopt rules and establish such procedures as the lead agency may determine to be necessary to assure:

(a) That the payments and assistance authorized by this chapter are administered in a manner that is fair and reasonable and as uniform as practicable;

(b) That a displaced person who makes proper application for a payment authorized for that person by this chapter is paid promptly after a move or, in hardship cases, is paid in advance; and

(c) That a displaced person who is aggrieved by a program or project that is under the authority of a state agency or local public agency may have his or her application reviewed by the state agency or local public agency.

(2) The lead agency, after full consultation with the department of enterprise services, may adopt such other rules and procedures, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, as the lead agency deems necessary or appropriate to carry out this chapter.

(3) State agencies and local public agencies shall comply with the rules adopted pursuant to this section by April 2, 1989.

[ 2015 c 225 s 7; 2011 c 336 s 281; 1988 c 90 s 8.]

NOTES:

Section captions—1988 c 90: See note following RCW 8.26.010.